data/lexd/10-nouns.lexd
LEXICON InflN_P25_x
<Sg><Nom>:a[gFem]
<Sg><Nom>:s[gMsc]
<Sg><Nom>:·an[gNeut]
<Sg><Gen>:·as[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Sg><Dat>:·ai[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·asmu[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:·asmu[gNeut]
<Sg><Acc>:·an[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Nom>:·as[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·ai[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:·ai[gNeut]
<Pl><Gen>:·an[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Dat>:·amans[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]
<Pl><Acc>:·ans[gFem,gMsc,gNeut]

LEXICON InflN_P12_x
<Sg><Nom>:·āns[gMsc]
<Sg><Gen>:·enesse[gMsc]
<Sg><Dat>:·enesmu[gMsc]
<Sg><Acc>:·ennan[gMsc]
<Pl><Nom>:·enēi[gMsc]
<Pl><Gen>:·enēisan[gMsc]
<Pl><Dat>:·enēimans[gMsc]
<Pl><Acc>:·ennans[gMsc]

LEXICON InflN_P45_x
<Sg><Nom>:a[gFem]
<Sg><Gen>:·as[gFem]
<Sg><Dat>:·ai[gFem]
<Sg><Acc>:·an[gFem]
<Pl><Nom>:·as[gFem]
<Pl><Gen>:·an[gFem]
<Pl><Dat>:·amans[gFem]
<Pl><Acc>:·ans[gFem]

LEXICON InflN_P1_x
<Sg><Nom>:·as
<Sg><Gen>:·māise
<Sg><Dat>:·mennei
<Sg><Acc>:·men
<Pl><Nom>:·mes
<Pl><Gen>:·nūse
<Pl><Dat>:·nūmans
<Pl><Acc>:·mans

LEXICON InflN_P2_x
<Sg><Nom>:·tū
<Sg><Gen>:·twāise
<Sg><Dat>:·tebbei
<Sg><Acc>:·ten
<Pl><Nom>:jūs
<Pl><Gen>:jūse
<Pl><Dat>:jūmans
<Pl><Acc>:·wans
